Illinois, session 104th, HB5088.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Criminal Code of 2012 is amended by 5changing Section 11-9.1B as follows: 6    (720 ILCS 5/11-9.1B)7    Sec. 11-9.1B. Failure to report sexual abuse of a child.8    (a) For the purposes of this Section:9    "Child" means any person under the age of 13.10    "Sexual abuse" means any contact, however slight, between 11the sex organ or anus of the victim or the accused and an 12object or body part, including, but not limited to, the sex 13organ, mouth, or anus of the victim or the accused, or any 14intrusion, however slight, of any part of the body of the 15victim or the accused or of any animal or object into the sex 16organ or anus of the victim or the accused, including, but not 17limited to, cunnilingus, fellatio, or anal penetration. 18Evidence of emission of semen is not required to prove sexual 19abuse.20    (b) A person over the age of 18 commits failure to report 21sexual abuse of a child when he or she is aware of, has a 22reasonable belief, or personally observes sexual abuse, as 23defined by this Section, between a person who he or she knows   HB5088- 2 -LRB104 17983 RLC 31420 b1is over the age of 18 and a person he or she knows is a child, 2and knowingly fails to report the sexual abuse to law 3enforcement.4    (c) This Section does not apply to a person who makes 5timely and reasonable efforts to stop the sexual abuse by 6reporting the sexual abuse in conformance with the Abused and 7Neglected Child Reporting Act or by reporting the sexual abuse 8or causing a report to be made, to medical or law enforcement 9authorities or anyone who is a mandated reporter under Section 104 of the Abused and Neglected Child Reporting Act.11    (d) A person may not be charged with the offense of failure 12to report sexual abuse of a child under this Section until the 13person who committed the offense is charged with criminal 14sexual assault, aggravated criminal sexual assault, predatory 15criminal sexual assault of a child, criminal sexual abuse, or 16aggravated criminal sexual abuse.17    (e) It is an affirmative defense to a charge of failure to 18report sexual abuse of a child under this Section that the 19person who personally observed the sexual abuse had a 20reasonable apprehension that timely action to stop the abuse 21would result in the imminent infliction of death, great bodily 22harm, permanent disfigurement, or permanent disability to that 23person or another in retaliation for reporting.24    (f) Sentence. A person who commits failure to report 25sexual abuse of a child is guilty of a Class A misdemeanor for 26the first violation and a Class 4 felony for a second or   HB5088- 3 -LRB104 17983 RLC 31420 b1subsequent violation.2    (g) Nothing in this Section shall be construed to allow 3prosecution of a person who personally observes the act of 4sexual abuse and assists with an investigation and any 5subsequent prosecution of the offender.6(Source: P.A. 98-370, eff. 1-1-14; 98-756, eff. 7-16-14.)